Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 1 MOTOR VEHICLE DEALERS
44-20-142. Repeal of part.

This part 1 is repealed, effective September 1, 2027. Before its repeal, this part 1 is scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 90, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-6-133 as it existed prior to 2018.